Hawaii statutes.
§206E-5 Designation of community
development districts; community development plans. (a) The legislature,
by statute, may designate an area as a community development district if it
determines that there is need for replanning, renewal, or redevelopment of that
area. The designation shall describe the boundaries of the district.

(b) After designation, the authority shall
develop a community development plan for the designated district. The plan
shall include but not be limited to community development guidance policies,
district-wide improvement program and community development rules.

(c) The authority may enter into cooperative
agreements with qualified persons or public agencies, where the powers,
services, and capabilities of such persons or agencies are deemed necessary and
appropriate for the development of the community development plan.

(d) Whenever possible, planning activities of
the authority shall be coordinated with federal, state and county plans.
Consideration shall be given to state goals and policies, adopted state plan or
land use guidance policies, county general plans, development plans, and
ordinances.

(e) The authority shall hold a public hearing
on a proposed community development plan pursuant to chapter 91 and, after consideration
of comments received and appropriate revision, shall submit the community
development plan to the governor for the governor's approval.

After approval, the governor shall submit to
the legislature requests for appropriations, authorization to issue bonds, or
both, to implement the community development plan in an orderly, affordable,
and feasible manner. The governor shall submit the requests to the legislature
as part of the executive budget or supplemental budget, as appropriate. In
addition to the information, data, and materials required under chapter 37, the
requests shall be accompanied by:

(1) Plans, maps, narrative descriptions, and other
appropriate materials on the:

(A) Locations and design of projects or
public facilities proposed to be funded; and

(B) Phase of the community development plans
proposed to be implemented with the requested funds; and

(2) Other information deemed by the governor of
significance to the legislature regarding the projects or public facilities
proposed to be funded, including a discussion of the public benefits intended
by, and adverse effects which may result from, implementation of the projects
or public facilities.

(f) The authority may amend the community
development plan as may be necessary. Amendments shall be made in accordance
with chapter 91. [L 1976, c 153, pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 355, §5]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next